Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.230

Merger or consolidation—When effected.

Upon the filing of articles of merger, or the articles of consolidation by the secretary of state, the merger or consolidation shall be effected.

[ 1982 c 35 s 135; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 46.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.